Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 3. Agricultural Exports

§ 4621.
Domestic Export Program.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, in collaboration with the Agency of Commerce and Community Development and the Chief Marketing Officer, shall have the authority to create a Domestic Export Program, the purpose of which may include:

connecting Vermont producers with brokers, buyers, and distributors in other U.S. state and regional markets;

providing technical and marketing assistance to Vermont producers to convert these connections into increased sales and sustainable commercial relationships; and

providing one-time matching grants to attend trade shows and similar events to expand producers’ market presence in other U.S. states, subject to available funding.

The Secretary shall collect data on the activities and outcomes of the program authorized under this section and submit his or her findings and recommendations in a report on or before January 15 of each year to the House Committees on Agriculture and Forest Products and on Commerce and Economic Development and to the Senate Committees on Agriculture and on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 51

, § D.5, eff. June 3, 2015.